en: Non-dairy yogurts, vegan yogurts, Dairy-free yoghurts
de: pflanzenbasierte Joghurts, milchfreie Joghurts, veganer joghurts
es: Yogures vegetales
fi: Vegaanijogurtit
fr: Desserts végétaliens fermentés, Yaourts végétaux, yaourt végétal, yaourt végan, yaourts sans lait
hr: veganski jogurti
it: Yogurt vegetali, yogurt vegani
lt: Jogurtai be pieno, vaganiški jogurtai
nl: Plantaardige yoghurts, plantaardige yoghurt, Zuivelvrije yoghurts
pl: Jogurty bezmleczne
pt: Iogurtes não lácteos

en: Coconutmilk yogurts, Dairy-free coconut-based yoghurts
fr: Desserts de lait de coco fermenté
hr: Jogurti od kokosovog mlijeka
lt: Kokosų pieno jogurtai, Kokosų jogurtai be pieno
nl: Zuivelvrije kokosnootyoghurts

en: Oat milk yogurts
fr: Desserts de jus d'avoine fermenté
hr: Jogurti od zobenog mlijeka
lt: Avižų pieno jogurtai
nl: Haver yoghurt, Havergurt

en: Almond milk yogurts
es: Yogures de leche de almendras
fr: Desserts de lait d'amande fermenté
hr: Jogurti od bademovog mlijeka
it: Yogurt al latte di mandorla
lt: Migdolų pieno jogurtai
pt: Iogurtes de leite de amêndoa
zh: 杏仁奶酸奶

en: Soy milk yogurts, soy yogurts, soya yogurts, soygurts, yofu
ca: Iogurt de soja
de: Sojajoghurt, Sojajogurt, Sojajoghurts, Sojajogurts
es: Yogures de soja, Yogures de soya
fi: Soijapohjaiset jogurtit
fr: Desserts de jus de soja fermenté, Yaourts au soja, Yaourts soja, yaourts au lait de soja
hr: Jogurti od sojinog mlijeka
it: Yogurt di soia, Soia yogurt
lt: Sojų pieno jogurtai, sojų jogurtai
nl: Sojayoghurts
pt: Iogurtes de soja

en: Plain soy yogurts, Natural soy yogurts
de: Einfacher Soja-Joghurt, Natürlicher Soja-Joghurt
es: Yogures de soja naturales, Yogures de soja natural
fr: Yaourts soja natures, Yaourts au soja natures
hr: Obični sojini jogurti
hu: Természetes szójatej
it: Yogurt di soia semplice
lt: Paprasti sojų jogurtai, Natūralūs sojų jogurtai
nl: Naturel sojayoghurts

en: Fruit soy yogurts
de: Frucht-Soja-Joghurts
es: Yogures de soja con frutas
fi: Hedelmä-soijajogurtit
fr: Yaourts de soja aux fruits, Yaourts soja aux fruits, Yaourts au soja aux fruits
hr: Voćni sojini jogurti
it: Yogurt di soia alla frutta
lt: Vaisių sojų jogurtai
nl: Fruit sojayoghurts

en: Strawberry soy yogurts, Strawberry soygurts
de: Erdbeer-Soja-Joghurt
es: Yogures de soja con fresa
fr: Yaourts de soja à la fraise
hr: Jagoda soja jogurti
lt: Braškių sojų jogurtai
nl: Aardbeiensojayoghurts

en: Raspberry soy yogurts
es: Yogures de soja con frambuesa
fr: Yaourts de soja à la framboise
hr: Jogurti od maline i soje
lt: Aviečių sojų jogurtai

en: Lemon soy yogurts, Soy yogurt with lemon
de: Zitronensojajoghurt, Sojajoghurt mit Zitrone
es: Yogures de soja con limón
fr: Yaourts soja au citron
hr: Limun sojini jogurti
lt: Citrinų sojų jogurtai
nl: Citroensojayoghurt, Citroensojayoghurts, Sojayoghurt met citroen

en: Banana soy yogurts
de: Bananen-Soja-Joghurt
es: Yogures de soja con plátano
fr: Yaourts de soja à la banane
hr: Jogurti od banane i soje
lt: Bananų sojų jogurtai
nl: Banaansojayoghurts

en: Cherry soy yogurts
de: Kirsch-Soja-Joghurt
es: Yogures de soja con cerezas
fr: Yaourts de soja aux cerises
hr: Jogurti od trešnje i soje
lt: Vyšnių sojų jogurtai
nl: Kersensojayoghurts

en: Peach soy yogurts
de: Pfirsich-Soja-Joghurt
es: Yogures de soja con melocotón
fr: Yaourts de soja à la pêche
hr: Jogurti od breskve i soje
lt: Persikų sojų jogurtai
nl: Perzikensojayoghurts

en: Apricot soy yogurts
es: Yogures de soja con albaricoque
fr: Yaourts de soja à l'abricot
hr: Jogurti od marelice i soje
lt: Abrikosų sojų jogurtai

en: Blueberry soy yogurts
de: Heidelbeer-Soja-Joghurt
es: Yogures de soja con arándanos
fr: Yaourts de soja à la myrtille
hr: Jogurti od borovnice i soje
lt: Mėlynių sojų jogurtai
nl: Bosbessensojayoghurts

en: Mixed fruit soy yogurts
de: Soja-Joghurt mit gemischten Früchten
es: Yogures de soja con frutas variadas
fr: Yaourts soja aux fruits mixés
hr: Miješani voćni sojini jogurti
lt: Įvairių vaisių sojų jogurtai
nl: Multifruitsojayoghurts, multivruchtensojayoghurts

en: Berries soy yogurts
de: Beeren-Soja-Joghurt
es: Yogures de soja con frutas del bosque, Yogures de soja con frutos rojos
fr: Yaourts soja aux fruits rouges
hr: Bobičasto voće soja jogurti
lt: Įvairių uogų sojų jogurtai
nl: Bosvruchtensojayoghurts

en: Tropical fruits soy yogurts
de: Sojajoghurt mit tropischen Früchten
es: Yogures de soja con frutas tropicales, Yogures de soja con frutas amarillas
fr: Yaourts soja aux fruits tropicaux
hr: Tropsko voće sojini jogurti
lt: Tropinių vaisių sojų jogurtai
nl: Tropische vruchtensojayoghurts

en: Diet beverages, Diet drinks
bg: Диетични напитки
de: Kalorienarme Getränke, Kalorienreduzierte Getränke, Diät Getränke
es: Bebidas light
fi: Kevytvirvoitusjuomat, Kevytjuomat
fr: Boissons light
he: משקאות דיאטה
hr: Dijetalna pića
it: Bevande dietetiche
ja: ダイエット飲料
lt: Dietiniai gėrimai
nl: Light dranken
pl: Napoje dietetyczne, Napoje light
pt: Bebidas dietéticas
ru: Диетические напитки

en: Dietary drink for sport
ca: Begudes esportives, begudes per a esportistes, begudes isotònques, begudes rehidratants
es: Bebidas deportivas, bebidas para deportistas, Bebidas isotónicas, bebidas rehidratantes
fr: Boisson diététique pour le sport
hr: Dijetetski napitak za sport
lt: Sportiniai dietiniai gėrimai